Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.120

Interns—Registration—Renewal—Notice of termination—Fees.

Every person engaged in the business of funeral directing or embalming, who employs an intern to assist in the conduct of the business, shall register the name of each intern with the director at the beginning of the internship, and shall also forward notice of the termination of the internship. The registration shall be renewed annually and shall expire on the anniversary of the intern's birthdate. Fees determined under RCW 43.24.086 shall be paid for the initial registration of the intern, and for each annual renewal.

[ 2005 c 365 s 7; 1985 c 7 s 38; 1981 c 43 s 7; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 43; 1937 c 108 s 10; RRS s 8322.]